Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2938
Mediator's disclosure of conflicts of interest; background.

(a) Before accepting a mediation, an individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall:

(1) make an inquiry that is reasonable under the circumstances to determine whether there are any known facts that a reasonable individual would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the mediator, including a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the mediation and an existing or past relationship with a mediation party or foreseeable participant in the mediation; and

(2) disclose any such known fact to the mediation parties as soon as is practical before accepting a mediation.

(b) If a mediator learns any fact described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section after accepting a mediation, the mediator shall disclose it as soon as is practicable.

(c) An individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall disclose the mediator's qualifications to mediate a dispute.

(d) A person that violates subsection (a), (b), or (g) of this section is precluded by the violation from asserting a privilege under section 25-2933.

(e) Subsections (a), (b), (c), and (g) do not apply to an individual acting as a judge.

(f) The Uniform Mediation Act does not require that a mediator have a special qualification by background or profession.

(g) A mediator must be impartial, unless after disclosure of the facts required in subsections (a) and (b) of this section to be disclosed, the parties agree otherwise.

Laws 2003, LB 255, § 9.